District of Columbia statutes.
47-1806.09

Tax on residents and nonresidents; credits; lower income, long-term homeowner credit — Definitions.

For the purposes of §§ 47-1806.09 through 47-1806.09f, the term:

(1)

(A)

“Area median income” means:

(i)

For a household of 4 persons, the area median income for a household of 4 persons in the Washington Metropolitan Statistical Area as set forth in the periodic calculation provided by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development;

(ii)

For a household of 3 persons, 90% of the area median income for a household of 4 persons;

(iii)

For a household of 2 persons, 80% of the area median income for a household of 4 persons;

(iv)

For a household of one person, 70% of the area median income for a household of 4 persons;

(v)

For a household of more than 4 persons, the area median income for a household of 4 persons, increased by 10% of the area median income for a family of 4 persons for each household member exceeding 4 persons (e.g., the area median income for a family of 5 shall be 110% of the area median income for a family of 4; the area median income for a household of 6 shall be 120% of the area median income for a family of 4).

(B)

Any percentage of household income referenced in §§ 47-1806.09 through 47-1806.09e (e.g., 80% of household income) shall be determined through a direct mathematical calculation and shall not take into account any adjustments made by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for the purposes of the programs it administers. A determination required by this subparagraph shall be calculated for the fiscal year ending in the tax year for which the credit is claimed.

(2)

“Eligible residence” means a real property receiving the homestead deduction under § 47-850 or a unit within a cooperative housing association for which the cooperative housing association is receiving the homestead deduction under § 47-850.01.

(3)

“Eligible resident” means a resident, as defined in § 47-1801.04(17), who:

(A)

(i)

Owns an eligible residence as his principal place of residence and has resided in the eligible residence for at least 7 consecutive years immediately prior to the last day of the tax year; or

(ii)

Is a shareholder or member of a cooperative housing association, occupies by right an eligible residence by reason of his ownership of a stock or membership certificate, proprietary lease, or other evidence of membership in the cooperative housing association, and has resided in the eligible residence as his or her principal place of residence for at least 7 consecutive years immediately prior to the last day of the tax year; and

(B)

Has a household income equal to or less than 50% of the area median income.

(4)

“Household income” means the total “adjusted gross income”, as defined in § 47-1803.02(b), of every member of the household.

History

Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 401(b), 49 DCR 1468
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, §§ 33(s), 35(a), 49 DCR 8140
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 1172(b), 51 DCR 8441
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 77, 53 DCR 6794

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-1806.09f.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-213, in the introductory paragraph, substituted “§ 47-1806.09f” for “§ 4-1806.09f”; and made a technical change in the enacting clause of D.C. Law 14-114, § 401(b), which resulted in no change in text.
D.C. Law 15-205 added a new sentence at the end of par. (1)(B); in par. (2), substituted “real property receiving the homestead deduction under § 47-850 or a unit within a cooperative housing association for which the cooperative housing association is receiving the homestead deduction under § 47-850.01.” for “Class 1 property as defined in § 47-813(c-4)(1)”; in par. (3), substituted “resident, as defined in § 47-1801.04(17)” for “taxpayer, as defined in § 47-1801.04(7)”, and rewrote subpar. (A); and, in par. (4), substituted “means the total ‘adjusted gross income,’ as defined in § 47-1803.02(b), of every member of the household” for “have the same meaning as ‘household income’ in § 47-1806.06(b)(2)”. Prior to amendment, subpar. (A) of par. (3) had read as follows: “(A) Owns an eligible residence as his or her principal place of residence and has resided in the eligible residence for at least 7 years; and,”.
D.C. Law 16-191, in par. (4), validated a previously made technical correction.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Lower Income, Long-Term Homeowner Credit Administration Temporary Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-179, September 8, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 9221).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Lower Income, Long-term Homeowner Credit Administration Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-421, May 10, 2004, 51 DCR 5174).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1172(b) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1172(b) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 10 of Finance and Revenue Technical Amendments Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-585, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 340).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle P of title I of Law 15-205: Section 1171 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle P of title I of the act may be cited as Lower Income, Long-Term Homeowner Credit Administration Act of 2004.

Editor's Notes

Section 1101 of D.C. Law 14-114 provided: “The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall promulgate rules to implement this act.”